Hawaii, session 2025, GM1202.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAH:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that the
Intergovernmental Panel on Climate Change, the world’s leading
authority on climate science, in its Assessment Report 6 (2021)
stated that it has high confidence that global sea level is
committed to rise for centuries to millennia, regardless of
whether humans slow carbon emissions into the atmosphere.
The legislature also finds that the state climate change
mitigation and adaptation commission, created by Act 32, Session
Laws of Hawaii 2017, stated in its 2022 report to the
legislature that Hawaii is projected to likely experience
between 3.9 and 5.9 feet of sea level rise by the year 2100.
The legislature finds that sea level rise poses a serious and
imminent threat to Hawaii’s coastal communities and residents
and to Hawaii's natural resources, primarily beaches and coastal
ecosystems. The legislature recognizes that the State has an
affirmative duty to preserve beaches as a public trust resource
for the people of Hawaii, and that beaches are culturally
2025-3345 HB1137 GDI HMSO
liHIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIHI

Page 2 1137
H.B. NO.
H.D.2
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
important and provide natural resilience to sea level rise and
associated coastal flooding.
The purpose of this Act is to amend the definition of
"beach restoration" to expand the types of activities the State
recognizes as restorative and beneficial to beach lands in
response to increasing threats of sea level rise and beach loss.
SECTION 2. Section 171-151, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending the definition of "beach restoration" to
read as follows:
""Beach restoration" means [the placement of sand>—with or
without ot-abilizing atructuroo/—on an- -eroded beach from an
euteide—seur^ee—euefe—as—ef^eh©^?e—sand—depeait-s-7—afereaifts-r
channolo or-harbor mouths,—ar^-aa-aiplaHd—saad—gaa«?y-r] an
activity undertaken to:
(1) Maintain and improve beaches and dune systems through
management of sand and native dune vegetation;
(2) Place sand'on an eroded beach from an approved outside
or adjacent source, with or without stabilizing
structures; or
(3) Remove abandoned remnant materials from beaches and
dunes that pose a risk to public health and coastal
2025-3345 HB1137 CDl HMSO
IWHUIIIIIHIinillllRI

Page 3
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
ecosystems; provided that emergency erosion protection
structures constructed pursuant to permits issued by
the department and that continue to provide the
protection for which they were permitted shall not be
deemed abandoned remnant materials.”
SECTION 3. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
2025-3345 HB1137 CDl HMSO 3
lllllllllllillllllllMIIII

H.B. NO.
-'2
S.D. 1
C.D, 1
APPROVED this 27th day of May , 2025
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

HB No. 1137, HD 2, SD 1,CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of2025.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B. No. 1137, H.D. 2, S.D. 1, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAW API
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2025.
Clerk of the Senate